Louisiana, session 2026, HB1191.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:29.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§29.3. Certificate of compliance for oilfield sites and exploration and production
sites
A. Definitions. As used in this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
(1) "Certificate of compliance" means the document issued by the
department pursuant to this Section certifying that a site is in compliance with
applicable laws at the time of evaluation.
(2) "Corrective action period" means the six-month period following the
department's issuance of a report of noncompliance pursuant to Subparagraph
(B)(8)(b) of this Section, during which the requesting parties may take corrective
actions to achieve compliance.
Page 1 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1327 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1191
(3) "Environmental damage" shall have the same meaning as provided in
R.S. 30:29(I)(2).
(4) "Most feasible plan" shall have the same meaning as provided in R.S.
30:29(I)(4).
(5) "Notice" means the written joint notice filed by the requesting parties
with the department pursuant to Paragraph (B)(1) of this Section to initiate the
voluntary evaluation process pursuant to this Section.
(6) "Operator of interest" means the most recent solvent prior operator of
record or any registered operator in good standing with the department that has
acquired either a lease or other right to discover and produce minerals from the site
or a bona fide option to acquire such a lease.
(a) No person or entity shall initiate or participate in the certificate of
compliance process for the purpose of generating, obtaining, or preserving
environmental data or sampling results for use as evidence in any pending or
anticipated litigation or administrative proceeding to which that person is a party and
in which conditions at the site are at issue, other than in a proceeding in which a
certificate of compliance itself is asserted as an affirmative defense following its
issuance.
(b) For purposes of this Section, "operator of interest" does not include a
royalty owner, overriding royalty interest owner, or any other person whose interest
in the site is limited to a financial or production interest and who does not bear direct
operational responsibility for the site as operator of record or as a lessee under
applicable law. The exclusion of the owner of an interest, including any working
interest owners, from this definition does not affect any rights or obligations such
owners may have under applicable law.
(7) "Requesting parties" means the surface owner, or their authorized
representative, and the operator of interest of a historic oilfield site or exploration
and production site subject to regulation under applicable law, acting jointly. A
certificate of compliance shall not be issued unless both the surface owner and the
Page 2 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1327 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1191
operator of interest join in the notice to the department and in all subsequent phases
of the evaluation process. Where the surface owner and operator of interest are the
same person or entity, a single applicant shall satisfy this requirement and be
considered a "requesting party".
(8) "Review period" means the one-year period commencing upon the
department's receipt of the notice, or any extension thereof granted pursuant to
Paragraph (B)(7) of this Section, during which the requesting parties may submit
data and documentation and the department shall conduct an evaluation of the site.
(9) "Site" means any location, including any facility, structure, installation,
equipment, or construction of any type at the location, and any environmental media
at the location, including soil, surface water, ground water, and sediment, that is
subject to regulation under applicable law. The boundaries and depth of the "site"
may be delineated by the parties.
B. Notice and evaluation process.
(1) To initiate the certificate of compliance process, the requesting parties
shall jointly file a written notice with the department. The process is strictly
voluntary and may not be initiated during any pending litigation making a judicial
demand arising from or alleging environmental damage with respect to the site. The
notice shall include the following:
(a) Identification of the requesting parties by name and in what capacity each
is acting.
(b) Identification of the site to be evaluated, including its location by section,
township, range, and parish and any delineation of boundaries and depth to which
the requesting parties have agreed if applicable.
(c) A map, plat, or survey which clearly delineates the boundaries of the site.
(d) A statement that the requesting parties jointly and voluntarily seek a
certificate of compliance for the site pursuant to this Section.
(2) Until such time as the department promulgates rules in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act providing a method for filing and considering a
Page 3 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1327 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1191
notice, the notice shall be filed by certified mail, signed by both requesting parties,
addressed to the secretary.
(3) The joint filing shall constitute notice to and consent by the surface
owner for all purposes, including satisfaction of any notification requirements
otherwise applicable under R.S. 30:29.1.
(4) The review period shall commence upon receipt of the notice by the
department. During the review period, the requesting parties may submit to the
department any data, environmental sampling results, testing reports, operational
records, and other documentation relevant to the compliance status of the site. The
requesting parties shall retain custody of all such data and documentation and shall
not be required to submit any materials to the department; however, the requesting
parties may voluntarily submit such materials for consideration by the department.
Submission of a notice, data, or documentation to the department pursuant to this
Section shall not constitute an admission of liability with respect to any condition at
the site.
(5) During the review period, agents of the department shall conduct at least
one visual inspection of the site, which shall be coordinated in advance with the
requesting parties, and a representative of each requesting party shall be present
during the inspection. The department may conduct subsequent site visits as it
deems necessary for the evaluation, provided that the requesting parties are given
reasonable advance notice of each visit and an opportunity to monitor.
(6) Prior to the issuance of a certificate of compliance or a report of
noncompliance, the requesting parties shall jointly execute an affidavit attesting to
the completeness and accuracy of all data and documentation submitted to the
department pursuant to this Section. The affidavit shall be executed by an authorized
representative of each requesting party. Submission of a materially false affidavit
shall void any certificate of compliance issued in reliance thereon and shall not bar
any claim the department otherwise has under applicable law.
Page 4 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1327 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1191
(7) The department may extend the review period for up to six additional
months upon a written request submitted by the requesting parties prior to the close
of the initial one-year review period. The request for extension shall state the basis
therefor, and the department shall grant or deny the request within thirty days of
receipt. If the department does not act on the request within thirty days, the
extension shall be deemed granted.
(8)(a) Within sixty days after the close of the review period, including any
extension thereof, the department shall issue to the requesting parties one of the
following determinations:
(i) A full or partial certificate of compliance, where the department has
evaluated the site and determined that the site, or the applicable portion thereof, is
in compliance with applicable law.
(ii) A report of environmental noncompliance, where the department
determines that one or more environmental media at the site contain contamination
exceeding applicable law. A report of environmental noncompliance shall describe
with particularity each item of substantive noncompliance identified, the
environmental media affected, the analytical data supporting each finding, and the
corrective actions required to achieve compliance. Upon issuance of a report of
environmental noncompliance, the corrective action period shall commence in
accordance with Subsection D of this Section.
(iii) A notice of administrative deficiency, where the department determines
that the site does not present contamination of environmental media above applicable
regulatory standards, but that one or more administrative, operational, or
recordkeeping requirements under applicable law have not been satisfied. A notice
of administrative deficiency shall not constitute a report of noncompliance for
purposes of this Section, shall not trigger the corrective action period under
Subsection D of this Section, and shall not give rise to any inference or presumption
of environmental liability with respect to the site. Administrative deficiencies
identified in a notice pursuant to this Item shall be addressed through the
department's regulatory and enforcement authority pursuant to this Subtitle and shall
Page 5 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1327 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1191
not affect the admissibility or preclusive effect of any certificate of compliance
issued as to environmental conditions at the site.
(b) Notwithstanding any outstanding administrative deficiencies that may be
addressed pursuant to Item (B)(8)(a)(iii) of this Section, where environmental
sampling and testing conducted during the review period demonstrates that all
sampled environmental media at the site meet the requirements of applicable law, the
department shall at minimum issue a partial certificate of compliance as to the
environmental conditions of those media. The existence of an outstanding notice of
administrative deficiency shall not delay, condition, or preclude the issuance of such
a certificate and the certificate shall carry the full preclusive effect described in
Subsection C of this Section as to environmental damage and property damage
claims relating to pre-certification conditions of those media.
(9) All data, information, communications, analyses, and documentation
generated or exchanged between the requesting parties and the department during the
evaluation process established by this Subsection, other than a certificate, partial
certificate, and a final report of environmental noncompliance, shall be confidential,
shall not be subject to the Public Records Law, R.S. 44:1 et seq., and shall not be
disclosed, used as evidence, or otherwise relied upon in any judicial or administrative
proceeding by a person other than a requesting party, the department, or any of their
respective successors or assigns. The requesting parties may, by mutual written
agreement, waive confidentiality as to any specific document or communication.
C. Effect of certificate of compliance.
(1) The issuance of a certificate of compliance shall foreclose future judicial
or administrative action by the department or any other governmental entity for fees,
penalties, or monetary damages relating to site conditions that existed prior to the
time of certification. Nothing shall preclude the department from issuing appropriate
orders to require corrective action relating to environmental site conditions arising
after the date of the certificate. The department may pursue only administrative
remedies to address environmental noncompliance that arises after the date of the
certificate.
Page 6 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1327 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1191
(2) In any private litigation filed relating to a site for which a certificate of
compliance has been issued, and notwithstanding R.S. 30:29(H)(1), the following
shall apply:
(a) The certificate of compliance shall be admissible evidence creating a
rebuttable presumption that operation of the site was reasonable, prudent, and in
conformance with industry standards and state requirements as of the date of
certification.
(b) No claim for environmental damage as defined in R.S. 30:29(I)(2), nor
any claim for property damage arising from or related to oilfield operations or
exploration and production activities, shall be maintained by any party with respect
to site conditions that existed prior to the date of the certificate of compliance.
(3) The issuance of a certificate of compliance for a site shall satisfy and
foreclose the requirements of R.S. 30:29 and R.S. 30:29.2 as to any environmental
damage or property damage claim relating to environmental site conditions that
existed prior to the date of the certificate. Where a certificate of compliance has
been issued, a most feasible plan shall not be required under R.S. 30:29 for
pre-certification conditions and the certificate shall constitute conclusive evidence
that the site meets applicable law as of the date of certification.
(4) When a certificate of compliance is asserted as an affirmative defense in
any subsequently filed litigation, the court shall conduct a threshold determination
of the validity of the certificate before requiring compliance with the notice, stay, or
plan procedures of R.S. 30:29 or the alternative dispute resolution procedures of R.S.
30:29.2. The presumption created by a certificate of compliance may be rebutted
only upon clear and convincing evidence that the certificate was procured by fraud
or material misrepresentation by the requesting parties. A certificate found valid by
the court shall be dispositive as to all claims relating to pre-certification site
conditions.
(5) The bar on claims established by Subparagraph (2)(b) of this Subsection
shall not apply to a claim brought solely to enforce an express contractual provision
Page 7 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1327 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1191
providing for remediation to original condition or to some other specific remediation
standard, as preserved by Paragraph (G)(1) of this Section, unless the surface owner
has voluntarily waived such contractual rights in writing prior to the issuance of the
certificate of compliance. A written waiver of such contractual rights shall be
binding upon the surface owner and any subsequent purchaser or transferee of the
surface estate upon recordation in the conveyance records of the parish in which the
site is located.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, no report
of environmental noncompliance may be used in any judicial proceeding against a
prior operator or lessee that is not a requesting party and that only held an interest
in the site prior to the joint written notice to the department.
D. Corrective action period.
(1) Upon issuance of a report of noncompliance pursuant to Subparagraph
(B)(8)(b) of this Section, the corrective action period shall commence. During the
corrective action period, the requesting parties may take such corrective actions as
are necessary to bring the site into compliance with applicable law. Either requesting
party may request reinspection by the department at any time during the corrective
action period.
(2) All data, environmental sampling results, testing reports, operational
records, correspondence, and other documentation generated, submitted to,
exchanged with, or reviewed by the department, the requesting parties, or their
agents or consultants on or after the commencement date of the corrective action
period in connection with the evaluation of the site shall be confidential, shall not be
subject to the Public Records Law, R.S. 44:1 et seq., and shall not be disclosed or
used as evidence in any judicial or administrative proceeding by a person who is not
a requesting party, the department, or any of their respective successors or assigns.
Nothing in this Paragraph shall apply to a final report of environmental
noncompliance. The requesting parties may, by mutual written agreement, waive
confidentiality as to any specific document or communication.
Page 8 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1327 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1191
(3) All judicial proceedings pending or subsequently initiated that assert
claims for environmental damage or property damage relating to pre-certification site
conditions shall be stayed during the corrective action period. Any party may apply
to the Nineteenth Judicial District Court to enforce the stay provided by this
Subsection. The stay shall terminate automatically upon the earliest of the
following:
(a) Issuance of a certificate of compliance by the department.
(b) Issuance of a final report of noncompliance by the department pursuant
to Paragraph (5) of this Subsection.
(c) Expiration of the corrective action period without the department having
issued a certificate of compliance or a final report of noncompliance.
(4) The department shall not assess penalties or issue compliance orders
pertaining to the items of noncompliance identified in the report of noncompliance
during the corrective action period, except that the department shall not be prohibited
from making any order necessary to address an imminent and substantial threat to
public health or safety.
(5) Following reinspection after completion of corrective actions, or at the
close of the corrective action period if reinspection has not been requested, the
department shall issue either a certificate of compliance or a final report of
noncompliance.
E. The venue for any lawsuit or administrative proceeding involving, arising
from, or challenging a certificate of compliance issued pursuant to this Section or a
boundary determination regarding the site, including any proceeding in which the
certificate is asserted as an affirmative defense or in which a party seeks to enforce
or dissolve the stay of judicial proceedings provided by Paragraph (D)(3) of this
Section, shall be exclusively in the Nineteenth Judicial District Court.
F. Fees and rulemaking.
(1) The department is authorized to promulgate rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section, including
but not limited to rules establishing the following:
Page 9 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1327 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1191
(a) A schedule of fees to be charged to requesting parties for the evaluation
and certification process, including the costs of inspections and reinspections.
(b) Procedures for filing and processing the notice and for subsequent phases
of the evaluation process, including the designation of a single point of contact and
procedures for voluntary data submission.
(c) Standards and protocols for the evaluation of sites for compliance with
applicable law, and protocols for the assessment of saltwater and brine contamination
at oilfield and exploration and production sites, consistent with any saltwater and oil
assessment program administered by the department.
(d) Procedures governing the corrective action period, including timelines
and requirements for reinspection requests.
(2) Until such time as the department promulgates rules pursuant to this
Subsection, the procedures set forth in Subsections B and D of this Section shall
govern the filing of the notice, the voluntary evaluation process, and the corrective
action period.
G. Voluntary waiver of remediation standard.
(1) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to impede or limit express
contractual provisions providing for remediation to original condition or some other
specific remediation standard. However, a surface owner may, at any time prior to
the issuance of a certificate of compliance, voluntarily execute a written waiver of
such contractual rights with respect to pre-certification site conditions, which waiver
shall be binding upon the surface owner and any subsequent purchaser or transferee
of the surface estate upon recordation in the conveyance records of the parish in
which the site is located. In the absence of an express contractual provision
providing otherwise, a party's legal responsibility is satisfied by meeting the
standards set forth in applicable law.
(2) To be effective, a waiver executed pursuant to this Subsection shall
conform to the following:
(a) Be in writing and signed by the surface owner or its duly authorized
representative.
Page 10 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1327 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1191
(b) Be expressly identified as a voluntary waiver of remediation to original
condition or other specific remediation standard if applicable.
(c) Describe with reasonable specificity the site or portion thereof to which
the waiver applies.
(d) Be filed with the department as part of, or as an attachment to, the notice,
or filed separately with the department at any time prior to the issuance of a
certificate of compliance, with a copy delivered to the operator of interest.
(3) A waiver executed and filed pursuant to this Subsection shall be recorded
by the surface owner in the conveyance records of the parish in which the site is
located within thirty days of filing with the department. Upon recordation, the
waiver shall be binding upon the surface owner and any subsequent purchaser or
transferee of the surface estate with respect to pre-certification site conditions.
(4) A waiver executed pursuant to this Subsection shall not impair any right
of the surface owner to enforce obligations arising from site conditions that occur
after the date of the certificate of compliance, nor shall it affect any express
contractual provision addressing post-certification remediation obligations.
H. Effect on operator succession and post-certification acquisition.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a person who
acquires a mineral lease, operating interest, or other right to conduct exploration and
production activities at a site for which a certificate of compliance has been issued
pursuant to this Section shall not, by virtue of that acquisition alone, become
responsible for or assume any obligation with respect to environmental damage or
property damage arising from pre-certification site conditions. Such acquisition shall
not subject the acquiring party to liability in solido with any prior operator, lessee,
or working interest owner for pre-certification conditions, nor shall it constitute a
basis for proceeding against the acquiring party as the operator of record for
pre-certification conditions. The acquiring party's regulatory and civil liability shall
be limited to site conditions arising from its own operations conducted after the date
of the certificate of compliance.
Page 11 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1327 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1191
(2) A certificate of compliance issued pursuant to this Section constitutes
conclusive documentation of the baseline environmental conditions at the site as of
the date of certification. In any subsequent judicial or administrative proceeding,
contamination or damage identified after the date of the certificate shall be presumed
to constitute post-certification conditions and shall not be deemed indistinguishable
from pre-certification conditions absent clear and convincing evidence to the
contrary. This presumption shall apply in favor of any operator who acquires an
interest in the site on or after the date of the certificate and against any claim seeking
to hold that operator responsible for pre-certification conditions on the basis that
post-certification and pre-certification damage cannot be distinguished.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall limit the liability of any person for
environmental damage or property damage caused by that person's own
post-certification operations, nor shall it limit the enforcement authority of the
department or any other governmental entity with respect to post-certification site
conditions. Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to release any prior
operator from liability to a subsequent operator or to the surface owner for
pre-certification conditions.
I. The procedures provided in this Section are voluntary and shall not be the
exclusive means by which a party may demonstrate compliance with applicable law.
For purposes of determining if any site or portion thereof is in compliance with
applicable law or regulatory standards as contemplated by this Section, the
department shall use and apply the Risk Evaluation and Corrective Action Program
(RECAP) and may use other exceptions to Statewide Order No. 29-B, LAC
43:XIX.101 et seq.
J. The certificate of compliance issued pursuant to this Section shall be
binding upon the requesting parties and any subsequent purchaser or transferee of the
surface or mineral estate upon recordation in the conveyance records of the parish
in which the site is located.
Page 12 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1327 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1191
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.